Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-223
Certification request; fees and costs.

Fees and costs shall be the same as in civil appeals docketed with the Supreme Court.

Laws 1982, LB 724, § 5.

Docket fees, see sections 33-103, 33-103.01, 33-107.01, and 33-107.03.